Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2473
Improper exercise of power; breach of fiduciary duty.

If the exercise of power concerning the estate is improper, the personal representative is liable to interested persons for damage or loss resulting from breach of his fiduciary duty to the same extent as a trustee of an express trust. The rights of purchasers and others dealing with a personal representative shall be determined as provided in sections 30-2474 and 30-2475.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 151, UPC § 3-712.

A motion to surcharge a personal representative is properly brought within the probate proceeding, because the facts underlying such motions ultimately concern the probate of the decedent's will and the distribution of the decedent's property. In re Estate of Graham, 301 Neb. 594, 919 N.W.2d 714 (2018).